Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3091.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18C.111, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Delegation of duties. The commissioner may delegate duties under this chapter to designated employees or agents of the Department of Agriculturenew text begin or cities of the first classnew text end . Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18C.111, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Certification of regulatory compliance. (a) The commissioner may, under rules adopted under section 18C.121, subdivision 1, certify a person to offer or perform a regulatory compliance inspection of any person or site that stores, handles, or distributes ammonia or anhydrous ammonia fertilizer. deleted text begin The deadlines established in section 14.125 are extended until June 30, 2014, for rules adopted under this subdivision.deleted text end (b) Pursuant to those rules, a person certified under paragraph (a) may issue a certification of compliance to an inspected person or site if the certified person documents in writing full compliance with the provisions of this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter. (c) A person or site issued a certification of compliance must provide a copy of the certification to the commissioner immediately upon request or within 90 days following certification. (d) Certifications of compliance are valid for a period of three years. The commissioner may determine a different time period in the interest of public safety or for other reasonable cause. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18C.111, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances. new text begin (a) new text end The Department of Agriculture is the lead state agency for the regulation of fertilizer containing PFAS, including the storage, handling, distribution, use, and disposal of fertilizer containing PFAS. In order to reduce duplication, a distributor, registrant, or guarantor is not required to provide technical data to another state agency if the distributor, registrant, or guarantor has previously submitted the data to the commissioner and the data is available to the other state agencies. new text begin (b) The commissioner may review the records of sewage sludge transfers under section 18C.135, subdivision 4, to investigate PFAS contamination or carry out any other duty in this chapter. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18C.135, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Sewage sludge without charge exempt. Sewage sludge that is transferred between parties without compensation is exempt from the requirements of this chapter except the labelingnew text begin and record retentionnew text end requirements of this chapter. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18C.135, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Record retention. new text end new text begin Any party receiving or transferring sewage sludge must maintain a record of the transaction that includes the date, amount, and parties involved. Records under this subdivision must be made available to the commissioner upon request. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18C.201, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Storage, handling, distribution, or disposal. A person may not store, handle, distribute, or dispose of a fertilizer, rinsate, fertilizer container, or fertilizer application equipment in a manner: (1) that endangers humans, damages agricultural products, food, new text begin feed, new text end livestock, deleted text begin fishdeleted text end new text begin aquatic lifenew text end , or wildlife; (2) that will cause unreasonable adverse effects on the environment; or (3) that will cause contamination of public or other waters of the state, as defined in section 103G.005, subdivisions 15 and 17, from backsiphoning or backflowing of fertilizers through water wells or from the direct flowage of fertilizers. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18C.201, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Fertilizer, rinsate, and container disposal. A person may only dispose of fertilizer, rinsate, and fertilizer containers in accordance with this chapter. The manner of disposal must not cause unreasonable adverse effects on the environment.new text begin For the purposes of this chapter, an open burn of fertilizer has an unreasonable adverse effect on the environment.new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18C.61, is amended to read: 18C.61 FERTILIZER APPLICATION TO IMPERVIOUS SURFACE; PROHIBITION. (a) A person may not apply a fertilizernew text begin , animal waste, or sewage sludgenew text end to an impervious surface. Fertilizernew text begin , animal waste, or sewage sludgenew text end released on an impervious surface must be immediately contained and either legally applied to turf or any other legal site or returned to the original or other appropriate container. (b) For the purposes of this section, "impervious surface" means a highway, street, sidewalk, parking lot, driveway, or other material that prevents infiltration of water into the soil.